Utah statutes.
62A-11-103.   Definitions.
As used in this part:
(1)  "Account" means a demand deposit account, checking or negotiable
withdrawal order account, savings account, time deposit account, or money-
market mutual fund account.
(2)  "Cash medical support" means an obligation to equally share all
reasonable and necessary medical and dental expenses of children.
(3)  "Child support services" or "IV-D child support services" means services
provided pursuant to Part D of Title IV of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C.
Sec. 651, et seq.
(4)  "Director" means the director of the Office of Recovery Services.
(5)  "Disposable earnings" means that part of the earnings of an individual
remaining after the deduction of all amounts required by law to be withheld.
(6)  "Financial institution" means:
(a)  a depository institution as defined in Section 7-1-103 or the Federal
Deposit Insurance Act, 12 U.S.C. Sec. 1813(c);
(b)  an institution-affiliated party as defined in the Federal Deposit
Insurance Act, 12 U.S.C. Sec. 1813(u);
(c)  any federal credit union or state credit union as defined in the Federal
Credit Union Act, 12 U.S.C. Sec. 1752, including an institution-affiliated
party of such a credit union as defined in 12 U.S.C. Sec. 1786(r);
(d)  a broker-dealer as defined in Section 61-1-13; or
(e)  any benefit association, insurance company, safe deposit company, money-
market mutual fund, or similar entity authorized to do business in the state.
(7)  "Financial record" is defined in the Right to Financial Privacy Act of
1978, 12 U.S.C. Sec. 3401.
(8)  "Income" means earnings, compensation, or other payment due to an
individual, regardless of source, whether denominated as wages, salary,
commission, bonus, pay, or contract payment, or denominated as advances on
future wages, salary, commission, bonus, pay, allowances, contract payment, or
otherwise, including severance pay, sick pay, and incentive pay.  "Income"
includes:
(a)  all gain derived from capital assets, labor, or both, including profit
gained through sale or conversion of capital assets;
(b)  interest and dividends;
(c)  periodic payments made under pension or retirement programs or insurance
policies of any type;
(d)  unemployment compensation benefits;
(e)  workers' compensation benefits; and
(f)  disability benefits.
(9)  "IV-D" means Part D of Title IV of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C.
Sec. 651 et seq.
(10)  "New hire registry" means the centralized new hire registry created in
Section 35A-7-103.
(11)  "Obligee" means an individual, this state, another state, or other
comparable jurisdiction to whom a debt is owed or who is entitled to
reimbursement of child support or public assistance.
(12)  "Obligor" means a person, firm, corporation, or the estate of a decedent
owing money to this state, to an individual, to another state, or other
comparable jurisdiction in whose behalf this state is acting.
(13)  "Office" means the Office of Recovery Services.
(14)  "Provider" means a person or entity that receives compensation from any
public assistance program for goods or services provided to a public
assistance recipient.
(15)  "Public assistance" or "assistance" means:
(a)  services or benefits provided under Title 35A, Chapter 3, Employment
Support Act;
(b)  medical assistance provided under Title 26, Chapter 18, Medical
Assistance Act;
(c)  foster care maintenance payments under Part E of Title IV of the Social
Security Act, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 670, et seq.;
(d)  food stamps; or
(e)  any other public funds expended for the benefit of a person in need of
financial, medical, food, housing, or related assistance.
(16)  "State case registry" means the central, automated record system
maintained by the office and the central, automated district court record
system maintained by the Administrative Office of the Courts, that contains
records which use standardized data elements, such as names, social security
numbers and other uniform identification numbers, dates of birth, and case
identification numbers, with respect to:
(a)  each case in which services are being provided by the office under the
state IV-D child support services plan; and
(b)  each support order established or modified in the state on or after
October 1, 1998.
